California statutes. Corporations Code
(A) Noncompliance with subdivision (a) of Section 5231, 7231, or 9241.

(B) Noncompliance with Section 5234, subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 7233, or Section 9244.

(C) Noncompliance with Section 5236 or 7235.

(D) Transactions covered by Section 5233.

(E) Transactions covered by Section 9243.

(b) (1) A ratification of a corporate action pursuant to this section, other than a ratification relating to the election of the initial directors pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subdivision, shall be approved by the board and, as applicable, approved by the members in accordance with any provision set forth in this division or the articles, bylaws, or a plan or agreement to which the corporation is a party that is applicable to the type of corporate action proposed to be ratified and in effect at the time of the ratification, unless there are no members entitled to vote on the ratification at the time of the ratification, in which case the ratification shall be approved solely by the board, or a higher approval standard that was or would have been applicable to
 the original taking or purported taking of the corporate action, in which case the ratification shall be approved in accordance with such higher approval standard. In order to approve a ratification of a corporate action pursuant to this paragraph, the board and, as applicable, the members shall adopt resolutions setting forth all of the following:

(A) Each corporate action to be ratified.

(B) The date when each such corporate action was purportedly taken, and the date any such corporate action shall be deemed to have become effective pursuant to this section if different than the date the corporate action was purportedly taken.

(C) The nature of the noncompliance or purported noncompliance of each such corporate action.

(D) A statement that the
 ratification of each such corporate action is approved.

(2) If the corporate action to be ratified relates to the election of the initial directors pursuant to Section 5134, 7134, or 9134, a majority of the persons who, at the time of the ratification, are exercising the powers of directors may approve that ratification by adopting resolutions setting forth all of the following:

(A) The name of the person or persons who first took action in the name of the corporation as the initial directors of the corporation.

(B) The earlier of the date on which such persons first took such action or were purported to have been elected as the initial directors, and the date on which such person or persons shall be deemed to have become the initial directors of the corporation pursuant to this section if different than the date of
 such first action or purported election, as applicable.

(C) That the ratification of the election of such person or persons as the initial directors is approved.

(c) Notice of any ratification of a corporate action pursuant to this section shall be given promptly after ratification pursuant to subdivision (b) to each member, regardless of whether approval of the members is required for the ratification. The notice shall be given as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 5511 or 7511 or subdivision (a) of Section 9411, as applicable, and shall include a copy of any resolutions adopted pursuant to subdivision (b) and a copy of this section.

(d) (1) If a corporate action ratified pursuant to this section would have required the filing of an instrument with the Secretary of State pursuant to the
 provisions of this division, or if such ratification would cause any instrument previously filed with the Secretary of State to be inaccurate or incomplete in any material respect after giving effect to the ratification, the corporation shall file a certificate of ratification to make, amend, or correct each such instrument. The certificate of ratification shall have the effect as specified therein, and shall be filed with the Secretary of State. A certificate of ratification shall consist of an officers’ certificate setting forth all of the following:

(A) The name of the corporation and the Secretary of State’s file number of the corporation.

(B) The title of any such instrument whose making, amendment, or correction is being effected by the certificate of ratification.

(C) The date any such instrument was filed
 with the Secretary of State, or a statement that any such instrument was not previously filed with the Secretary of State and, as applicable, a statement that the ratification approved pursuant to the resolutions set forth in the certificate of ratification would cause any such instrument to be inaccurate or incomplete in any material respect after giving effect to the ratification.

(D) The date any such instrument shall be deemed to have become effective pursuant to this section, which may be prior to or after the filing date.

(E) A statement that the certificate of ratification is making, amending, or correcting any such instrument, as applicable, and a copy of any such instrument containing all of the information required to be included under this division for such instrument to be so made, amended, or corrected. An instrument attached to a certificate of ratification pursuant
 to this subparagraph need not be separately executed and acknowledged and need not include any statement required by any other section of this division that such instrument has been approved and adopted in accordance with the provisions of such other section.

(F) A statement that the ratification has been approved pursuant to subdivision (b), a copy of the resolutions adopted pursuant to subdivision (b) in respect of the ratification.

(2) The office of the Secretary of State may, in its discretion, refuse to file any certificate of ratification if the instrument would render prior filings with the Secretary of State inaccurate, ambiguous, or unintelligible. Upon refusal of the Secretary of State to file a certificate of ratification pursuant to this subdivision, the corporation shall seek validation pursuant to subdivision (e).

(e) (1) Upon the filing of a petition by an authorized person, the superior court of the proper county shall have jurisdiction in equity to determine the validity of any corporate action (whether or not such corporate action is a ratification or has been the subject of any ratification), validate and declare effective any such corporate action, and declare the date any such corporate action shall be deemed to have become effective or valid, as applicable, pursuant to this section.

(2) This section does not prescribe or circumscribe the facts and circumstances the superior court may consider or which remedies the superior court may grant in exercising its jurisdiction under this section, except as described in this subdivision. The superior court may make any order concerning the corporate action as justice and equity may require.

(3) Any petition
 relating to a ratification taken or proposed to be taken pursuant to this section shall be filed not later than 180 days after the notice required by subdivision (c) is given, except this paragraph shall not apply to an action asserting that a ratification was not accomplished in accordance with this section or to any person to whom notice of the ratification was required to have been given pursuant to subdivision (c), but to whom such notice was not given.

(4) For purposes of this subdivision, the proper county shall be the county where the principal office of the corporation is located or, if the principal office is not located in this state, in the county in which the corporation’s agent for service of process is located.

(5) Service of the petition under paragraph (1) upon the registered agent of the corporation shall be deemed to be service upon the corporation, and no other
 party need be joined in order for the superior court to adjudicate the matter. The superior court may require notice of the action to be provided to other persons specified by the court and permit those other persons to intervene in the action.

(6) For purposes of this subdivision, “authorized person” means the corporation, any successor entity to the corporation, any director, any member, or any other person, so long as the other person claims to be substantially and adversely affected by the ratification of a corporate action pursuant to this section.

(7) Any petition seeking validation of a corporate action shall identify every pending legal proceeding of which the petitioner is aware and in which (A) the validity of the corporate action is being directly challenged or (B) the validation of the corporate action would result in the dismissal of the proceeding in whole or in
 part. If the petitioner becomes aware of any additional such legal proceeding, the petitioner shall amend, or, to the extent required by applicable rules, move for leave to amend, the petition within 10 court days to identify each such proceeding. Identification of a proceeding shall include the venue or forum in which the proceeding was filed, any case number or other unique identifier assigned to the proceeding in that venue or forum, the names of the parties to the proceeding, and the date on which the proceeding was filed.

(f) If a corporate action validated by the superior court pursuant to this section would have required the filing of an instrument with the Secretary of State pursuant to the provisions of this division, or if such validation would cause any instrument previously filed with the Secretary of State to be inaccurate or incomplete in any material respect after giving effect to the validation, the corporation shall file a
 certificate of validation to make, amend, or correct each such instrument. The certificate of validation shall have the effect as specified therein, and shall be filed with the Secretary of State. A certificate of validation shall consist of an officers’ certificate setting forth all of the following:

(1) The name of the corporation and the Secretary of State’s file number of the corporation.

(2) The title of any such instrument whose making, amendment, or correction is being effected by the certificate of validation.

(3) The date any such instrument was filed with the Secretary of State, or a statement that any such instrument was not previously filed with the Secretary of State and, as applicable, a statement that the validation ordered pursuant to the superior court order set forth in the certificate of validation
 would cause any such instrument to be inaccurate or incomplete in any material respect after giving effect to the validation.

(4) The date any such instrument shall be deemed to have become effective pursuant to this section, which may be prior to or after the filing date.

(5) A statement that the certificate of validation is making, amending, or correcting any such instrument, as applicable, and a copy of any such instrument containing all of the information required to be included under this division for such instrument to be so made, amended, or corrected. An instrument attached to a certificate of validation pursuant to this paragraph need not be separately executed and acknowledged and need not include any statement required by any other section of this division that such instrument has been approved and adopted in accordance with the provisions of such other section.

(6) A statement that the validation has been ordered pursuant to subdivision (e), and a copy of the superior court order issued pursuant to subdivision (e) in respect of such validation.

(g) Unless otherwise stated in resolutions adopted pursuant to subdivision (b) or determined by the superior court pursuant to subdivision (e), a corporate action or security of the corporation ratified or validated in accordance with this section relates back to the date of the original corporate action.

(h) As used in this section:

(1) “Corporate action” means any of the following:

(A) Any action or purported action of the board.

(B) Any
 action or purported action of the members.

(C) Any other action or transaction taken, or purportedly taken, by or on behalf of the corporation.

(2) “Higher approval standard” means any provision set forth in this division or the articles, bylaws, or a plan or agreement to which the corporation was a party in effect at the time of the original taking or purported taking of a corporate action:

(A) Requiring action of the board or members, at a meeting or by written consent, to be taken by a proportion greater than would have been required pursuant to this division or the articles, bylaws, or a plan or agreement to which the corporation is a party in effect at the time of the ratification of the corporate action pursuant to this section.

(B) Requiring a
 greater proportion of the directors or members to constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at a meeting than would have been required pursuant to this division or the articles, bylaws, or a plan or agreement to which the corporation is a party in effect at the time of the ratification of the corporate action pursuant to this section.

(C) Requiring, prohibiting, or prescribing conditions on action of the board or members at a meeting or by written consent, which would not have been required, prohibited, or prescribed pursuant to this division or the articles, bylaws, or a plan or agreement to which the corporation is a party in effect at the time of the ratification of the corporate action pursuant to this section.

(D) Requiring separate action of any specified person or persons, which would not have been required pursuant to this division or the articles, bylaws, or a
 plan or agreement to which the corporation is a party in effect at the time of the ratification of the corporate action pursuant to this section.

(i) The corporation shall retain all records related to the ratification or validation of a corporate action under this section in accordance with Section 6320, 8320, or 9510.

(j) If the corporation is a party to a pending legal proceeding in which (1) the validity of a corporate action sought to be ratified or validated pursuant to this section is at issue or (2) the ratification or validation of a corporate action pursuant to this section would result in the dismissal in whole or in part of the proceeding, the corporation shall notify the judge, arbitrator, or other person presiding over the proceeding at least 10 court days prior to adopting resolutions pursuant to subdivision (b) or filing a petition pursuant to subdivision (e) with
 respect to that corporate action. That person shall have power to stay the ratification or validation as justice and equity may require.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 151, Sec. 2.   (SB 446)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5030.

“Acknowledged” means that an instrument is either:

(a) Formally acknowledged as provided in Article 3 (commencing with Section 1180) of Chapter 4 of Title 4 of Part 4 of Division 2 of the Civil Code; or

(b) Accompanied by a declaration in writing signed by the persons executing the same that they are such persons and that the instrument is the act and deed of the person or persons executing the same.

Any certificate of acknowledgment taken without this state before a notary public or a judge or clerk of a court of record having an official seal need not be further authenticated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

5031.

A corporation is an “affiliate” of, or a corporation is “affiliated” with, another specified corporation if it directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by or is under common control with the other specified corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

5032.

“Approved by (or approval of) the board” means approved or ratified by the vote of the board or by the vote of a committee authorized to exercise the powers of the board, except as to matters not within the competence of the committee under Section 5212, Section 7212, or Section 9212.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

5033.

“Approval by (or approval of) a majority of all members” means approval by an affirmative vote (or written ballot in conformity with Section 5513, Section 7513, or Section 9413) of a majority of the votes entitled to be cast. Such approval shall include the affirmative vote of a majority of the outstanding memberships of each class, unit, or grouping of members entitled, by any provision of the articles or bylaws or of Part 2, Part 3, Part 4 or Part 5 to vote as a class, unit, or grouping of members on the subject matter being voted upon and shall also include the affirmative vote of such greater proportion, including all, of the votes of the memberships of any class, unit, or grouping of members if such greater proportion is required by the bylaws (subdivision (e) of Section 5151, subdivision (e) of Section 7151, or subdivision (e) of Section 9151) or Part 2, Part 3, Part 4 or Part 5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

5034.

“Approval by (or approval of) the members” means approved or ratified by the affirmative vote of a majority of the votes represented and voting at a duly held meeting at which a quorum is present (which affirmative votes also constitute a majority of the required quorum) or written ballot in conformity with Section 5513, 7513, or 9413 or by the affirmative vote or written ballot of such greater proportion, including all of the votes of the memberships of any class, unit, or grouping of members as may be provided in the bylaws (subdivision (e) of Section 5151, subdivision (e) of Section 7151, or subdivision (e) of Section 9151) or in Part 2, Part 3, Part 4 or Part 5 for all or any specified member action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

5035.

“Articles” includes the articles of incorporation, amendments thereto, amended articles, restated articles, and certificates of incorporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

5036.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b) or (c), “authorized number” means 5 percent of the voting power.

(b) Where (disregarding any provision for cumulative voting which would otherwise apply) the total number of votes entitled to be cast for a director is 1,000 or more, but less than 5,000 the authorized number shall be 212 percent of the voting power, but not less than 50.

(c) Where (disregarding any provision for cumulative voting which would otherwise apply) the total number of votes entitled to be cast for a director is 5,000 or more, the authorized number shall be one-twentieth of 1 percent of the voting power, but not less than 125.

(d) Any right under Part 2, Part 3, or Part 4 which may be exercised by the authorized number, or some multiple thereof, may be exercised by a member with written authorizations obtained within any 11-month period from members who, in the aggregate, hold the equivalent voting power. Any such authorization shall specify the right to be exercised thereunder and the duration thereof (which shall not exceed three years).

(e) Where any provision of Part 2, Part 3, or Part 4 specifies twice the authorized number, that means two times the number calculated according to subdivision (a), (b) or (c).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

5037.

“Bylaws” includes amendments thereto and amended bylaws.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

5038.

“Board” means the board of directors of the corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

5039.

“Business corporation” means a corporation as defined in Section 162 of the General Corporation Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

5039.5.

All references in this division to “chairperson of the board,” other than in Sections 5213, 7213, and 9213, shall be deemed to refer to all permissible titles for a chair of the board, as permitted by Sections 5213, 7213, and 9213.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 44.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

5040.

“Chapter” refers to a chapter of Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110), Part 3 (commencing with Section 7110), or Part 4 (commencing with Section 9110) unless otherwise expressly stated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 101, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

5041.

“Class” refers to those memberships which: (a) are identified in the articles or bylaws as being a different type of membership; or (b) have the same rights with respect to voting, dissolution, redemption and transfer. For the purpose of this section, rights shall be considered the same if they are determined by a formula applied uniformly.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

5043.

“Common shares,” as used in Part 3 (commencing with Section 7110), means shares which have no preference over any other shares with respect to distribution of assets on liquidation or with respect to payment of dividends.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 101, Sec. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

5044.

“Constituent corporation” means a corporation which is merged with one or more other corporations and includes the surviving corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

5045.

“Control” means the possession, direct or indirect, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

5046.

(a) “Corporation” as used in this part and Part 5 (commencing with Section 9910), refers to corporations defined in subdivisions (b), (c), and (d). 

(b) “Corporation,” as used in Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110), means a nonprofit public benefit corporation as defined in Section 5060.

(c) “Corporation,” as used in Part 3 (commencing with Section 7110) means a nonprofit mutual benefit corporation as defined in Section 5059.

(d) “Corporation,” as used in Part 4 (commencing with Section 9110), including those provisions of Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) made applicable pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 9610) of Part 4, means a nonprofit religious corporation as defined in Section 5061.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 101, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

5047.

Except as otherwise expressly provided, “directors” means natural persons, designated in the articles or bylaws or elected by the incorporators, and their successors and natural persons designated, elected, or appointed by any other name or title to act as members of the governing body of the corporation. If the articles or bylaws designate that a natural person is a director or a member of the governing body of the corporation by reason of occupying a specified position within the corporation or outside the corporation, without limiting that person’s right to vote as a member of the governing body, that person shall be a director for all purposes and shall have the same rights and obligations, including voting rights, as the other directors. A person who does not have authority to vote as a member of the
 governing body of the corporation, is not a director as that term is used in this division regardless of title.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 45.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5047.5.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the services of directors and officers of nonprofit corporations who serve without compensation are critical to the efficient conduct and management of the public service and charitable affairs of the people of California. The willingness of volunteers to offer their services has been deterred by a perception that their personal assets are at risk for these activities. The unavailability and unaffordability of appropriate liability insurance makes it difficult for these corporations to protect the personal assets of their volunteer decisionmakers with adequate insurance. It is the public policy of this state to provide incentive and protection to the individuals who perform these important functions.

(b) Except as provided in this section, no cause of action for monetary damages shall arise against any person serving without compensation as a director or officer of a nonprofit corporation subject to Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110), Part 3 (commencing with Section 7110), or Part 4 (commencing with Section 9110) of this division on account of any negligent act or omission occurring (1) within the scope of that person’s duties as a director acting as a board member, or within the scope of that person’s duties as an officer acting in an official capacity; (2) in good faith; (3) in a manner that the person believes to be in the best interest of the corporation; and (4) is in the exercise of his or her policymaking judgment.

(c) This section shall not limit the liability of a director or officer for any of the following:

(1) Self-dealing transactions, as described in Sections 5233 and 9243.

(2) Conflicts of interest, as described in Section 7233.

(3) Actions described in Sections 5237, 7236, and 9245.

(4) In the case of a charitable trust, an action or proceeding against a trustee brought by a beneficiary of that trust.

(5) Any action or proceeding brought by the Attorney General.

(6) Intentional, wanton, or reckless acts, gross negligence, or an action based on fraud, oppression, or malice.

(7) Any action brought under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 16700) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code.

(d) This section only applies to nonprofit corporations organized to provide religious, charitable, literary, educational, scientific, social, or other forms of public service that are exempt from federal income taxation under Section 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(e) This section applies only if the nonprofit corporation maintains a liability insurance policy with an amount of coverage of at least the following amounts:

(1) If the corporation’s annual budget is less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), the minimum required amount is five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).

(2) If the corporation’s annual budget equals or exceeds fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), the minimum required amount is one million dollars ($1,000,000).

This section applies only if the claim against the director or officer can also be made directly against the corporation and a liability insurance policy is applicable to the claim. If that policy is found to cover the damages caused by the director or officer, no cause of action as provided in this section shall be maintained against the director or officer.

(f) For the purposes of this section, the payment of actual expenses incurred in attending meetings or otherwise in the execution of the duties of a director or officer shall not constitute compensation.

(g) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the liability of a nonprofit corporation for any negligent act or omission of a director, officer, employee, agent, or servant occurring within the scope of his or her duties.

(h) This section does not apply to any corporation that unlawfully restricts membership, services, or benefits conferred on the basis of political affiliation, age, or any characteristic listed or defined in subdivision (b) or (e) of Section 51 of the Civil Code.

(i) This section does not apply to any volunteer director or officer who receives compensation from the corporation in any other capacity, including, but not limited to, as an employee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 631, Sec. 3.   (AB 1233)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

5048.

“Disappearing corporation” means a constituent corporation which is not the surviving corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

5049.

“Distribution” means the distribution of any gains, profits or dividends to any member as such. As used in this section, “member” means any person who is a member as defined in Section 5056 and any person who is referred to as a member as authorized by subdivision (a) of Sections 5332, 7333 and 9332.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

5050.

“Domestic corporation” means a corporation formed under the laws of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

5051.

“Filed,” unless otherwise expressly provided, means filed in the office of the Secretary of State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

5052.

“Foreign business corporation,” as used in Part 3 (commencing with Section 7110), means a foreign corporation as defined in Section 171 except that it does not include a foreign corporation as defined in Section 5053.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 101, Sec. 19.)
-------------------------------------------

5053.

“Foreign corporation” means any corporation incorporated in a jurisdiction other than California pursuant to that jurisdiction’s law for the incorporation of nonprofit corporations; except that as used in subdivision (b) of Section 5122, in subdivision (c) of Section 7122, and in subdivision (b) of Section 9122, “foreign corporation” means a corporation described in Section 171.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

5054.

“Incentive and benefit plans,” as used in Section 5140, in Section 7140, and in Section 9140 includes, but is not limited to, any plan or agreement under which the compensation of officers or employees is fixed, in full or in part, by reference to the financial performance of the corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

5055.

“Liquidating price” or “liquidation preference,” as used in Part 3 (commencing with Section 7110), means amounts payable on memberships of any class, upon voluntary or involuntary dissolution, winding up or distribution of the entire assets of the corporation, in priority to amounts payable to members of another class or classes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 101, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

5056.

(a) “Member” means any person who, pursuant to a specific provision of a corporation’s articles or bylaws, has the right to vote for the election of a director or directors or on a disposition of all or substantially all of the assets of a corporation or on a merger or on a dissolution unless the provision granting such right to vote is only effective as a result of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 7132. “Member” also means any person who is designated in the articles or bylaws as a member and, pursuant to a specific provision of a corporation’s articles or bylaws, has the right to vote on changes to the articles or bylaws.

(b) The articles or bylaws may confer some or all of the rights of a member, set forth in this part and in Parts 2 through 5 of this division, upon any person or persons who do not have any of the voting rights referred to in subdivision (a).

(c) Where a member of a corporation is not a natural person, such member may authorize in writing one or more natural persons to vote on its behalf on any or all matters which may require a vote of the members.

(d) A person is not a member by virtue of any of the following:

(1) Any rights such person has as a delegate.

(2) Any rights such person has to designate or select a director or directors. 

(3) Any rights such person has as a director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 36, Sec. 5.   Effective February 17, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

5057.

A “membership” refers to the rights a member has pursuant to a corporation’s articles, bylaws and this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

5058.

“Membership certificate,” as used in Part 3 (commencing with Section 7110), means a document evidencing a transferable property interest in a corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 101, Sec. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

5059.

“Nonprofit mutual benefit corporation” or “mutual benefit corporation” means a corporation which is organized under Part 3 (commencing with Section 7110), or subject to Part 3 under the provisions of subdivision (a) of Section 5003.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

5060.

“Nonprofit public benefit corporation” or “public benefit corporation” means a corporation which is organized under Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) or subject to Part 2 under the provisions of subdivision (a) of Section 5003.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

5061.

“Nonprofit religious corporation” or “religious corporation” means a corporation which is organized under Part 4 (commencing with Section 9110) or subject to Part 4 pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 5003.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

5062.

“Officer’s certificate” means a certificate signed and verified by the chair of the board, the president or any vice president and by the secretary, the chief financial officer, the treasurer or any assistant secretary or assistant treasurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 631, Sec. 4.   (AB 1233)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

5063.

“On the certificate,” as used in Part 3 (commencing with Section 7110), means that a statement appears on the face of a certificate or on the reverse thereof with a reference thereto on the face.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 101, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

5063.5.

“Other business entity” means a domestic or foreign limited liability company, limited partnership, general partnership, business trust, real estate investment trust, unincorporated association, or a domestic reciprocal insurer organized after 1974 to provide medical malpractice insurance as set forth in Article 16 (commencing with Section 1550) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 1 of the Insurance Code. As used herein, “general partnership” means a “partnership” as defined in Section 16101; “business trust” means a business organization formed as a trust; “real estate investment trust” means a “real estate investment trust” as defined in subsection (a) of Section 856 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended; and “unincorporated association” has the
 meaning set forth in Section 18035.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 361, Sec. 7.   (AB 1862)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5064.

A “parent” of a specified corporation is an affiliate controlling such corporation directly or indirectly through one or more intermediaries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

5064.5.

“Parent party” means the corporation in control of any constituent domestic or foreign corporation or other business entity and whose equity securities are issued, transferred, or exchanged in a merger pursuant to Section 6019.1 or 8019.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 437, Sec. 12.7.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

5065.

“Person,” in addition to those entities specified in Section 18 and unless otherwise expressly provided, includes any association, business corporation, company, corporation, corporation sole, domestic corporation, estate, foreign corporation, foreign business corporation, individual, joint stock company, joint venture, mutual benefit corporation, public benefit corporation, religious corporation, partnership, government or political subdivision, agency or instrumentality of a government.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

5067.

“Preferred shares,” as used in Part 3 (commencing with Section 7110), means shares other than common shares.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 101, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

5068.

“Proper county” means the county where the corporation’s principal office in this state is located or, if the corporation has no such office, the County of Sacramento.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

5069.

“Proxy” means a written authorization signed by a member or the member’s attorney in fact giving another person or persons power to vote on behalf of such member. “Signed” for the purpose of this section means the placing of the member’s name on the proxy (whether by manual signature, typewriting, telegraphic transmission or otherwise) by the member or such member’s attorney in fact.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

5070.

“Proxyholder” means the person or persons to whom a proxy is given.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

5071.

“Shareholder,” as used in Part 3 (commencing with Section 7110), means one who is a holder of record of shares.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 101, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

5072.

“Shares,” as used in Part 3 (commencing with Section 7110), means the units into which the proprietary interests in a business corporation or foreign business corporation are divided in the articles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 101, Sec. 26.)
-------------------------------------------

5073.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), “subsidiary” of a specified corporation means a corporation more than 50 percent of the voting power of which is owned directly, or indirectly through one or more subsidiaries, by the specified corporation.

(b) For the purpose of Section 7315, “subsidiary” of a specified corporation means a corporation more than 25 percent of the voting power of which is owned directly, or indirectly through one or more subsidiaries as defined in subdivision (a), by the specified corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

5074.

“Surviving corporation” means a corporation into which one or more other corporations are merged.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

5075.

“Vacancy” when used with respect to the board means any authorized position of director which is not then filled, whether the vacancy is caused by death, resignation, removal, change in the number of directors authorized in the articles or bylaws (by the board or the members) or otherwise.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

5076.

“Verified” means that the statements contained in a certificate or other document are declared to be true of the own knowledge of the persons executing the same in either:

(a) An affidavit signed by them under oath before an officer authorized by the laws of this state or of the place where it is executed to administer oaths; or 
